Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1312
Public funds; all-purpose levy; certification.

If it is necessary to certify the amount to county officers for collection, the same shall be certified as a single amount for general fund purposes.

Laws 1957, c. 47, § 4, p. 227;

Laws 1967, c. 96, § 4, p. 294.